Nevada, session 83, SB395-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 111 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:
(a) The total aggregate number of units of residential real
property in this State that may be purchased in any 1 calendar
year by corporations, limited-liability companies and affiliates of
such entities must not exceed 1,000 units.
(b) A corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such
an entity shall not purchase any unit of residential real property in
this State if, as a result of the purchase, the total aggregate
number of units of residential real property purchased in this State
during the current calendar year by corporations, limited-liability
companies or affiliates of such entities would exceed 1,000 units.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to:
(a) The intracorporate sale or transfer of units of residential
property; or
(b) The sale of newly constructed units of residential property.
3. The Securities Division of the Office of the Secretary of
State shall create and maintain a registry of corporations, limited-
liability companies and affiliates of such entities that purchase or
own residential real property in this State. The Securities Division
shall make such registry available on the Internet website of the
Office of the Secretary of State.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an entity
must register with the Securities Division of the Office of the
Secretary of State before purchasing any unit of residential real
-
*SB395_R3*

– 3 –
property in this State. The registration requirement does not apply
to a corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an
entity that owns less than 10 units of residential real property in
this State.
5. The Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of
registration to each corporation, limited liability company or
affiliate of such an entity that registers pursuant to this section.
6. The Secretary of State may charge a fee to each
corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an entity
that registers with the Securities Division pursuant to subsection 4.
7. The Secretary of State shall adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
8. As used in this section, the term:
(a) “Corporation” does not include:
(1) A family trust company, as defined in NRS 669.042.
(2) A housing authority, as defined in NRS 315.021.
(b) “Limited-liability company” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 86.061.
Sec. 2. NRS 111.312 is hereby amended to read as follows:
111.312 1. The county recorder shall not record with respect
to real property, a notice of completion, a declaration of homestead,
a declaration of removal of discriminatory restriction, a lien or
notice of lien, an affidavit of death, a mortgage or deed of trust, any
conveyance of real property or instrument in writing setting forth an
agreement to convey real property or a notice pursuant to NRS
111.3655 unless the document being recorded contains:
(a) The mailing address of the grantee or, if there is no grantee,
the mailing address of the person who is requesting the recording of
the document; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the assessor’s
parcel number of the property at the top left corner of the first page
of the document, if the county assessor has assigned a parcel
number to the property. The parcel number must comply with the
current system for numbering parcels used by the county assessor’s
office. The county recorder is not required to verify that the
assessor’s parcel number is correct.
2. Any document relating exclusively to the transfer of water
rights may be recorded without containing the assessor’s parcel
number of the property.
3. The county recorder shall not record with respect to real
property any deed, including, without limitation:
(a) A grant, bargain and sale deed;
(b) Quitclaim deed;
(c) Warranty deed; or
(d) Trustee’s deed upon sale,
-
*SB395_R3*

– 4 –
 unless the document being recorded contains the name and
address of the person to whom a statement of the taxes assessed on
the real property is to be mailed.
4. The assessor’s parcel number shall not be deemed to be a
complete legal description of the real property conveyed.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if a document
that is being recorded includes a legal description of real property
that is provided in metes and bounds, the document must include the
name and mailing address of the person who prepared the legal
description. The county recorder is not required to verify the
accuracy of the name and mailing address of such a person.
6. If a document including the same legal description described
in subsection 5 previously has been recorded, the document must
include all information necessary to identify and locate the previous
recording, but the name and mailing address of the person who
prepared the legal description is not required for the document to be
recorded. The county recorder is not required to verify the accuracy
of the information concerning the previous recording.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, if a
corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an entity
purchases residential real property:
(a) The county recorder shall not record the deed unless:
(1) The deed contains the information about the ownership
of the corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an
entity set forth in the registry created pursuant to section 1 of this
act; and
(2) The corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of
such an entity submits to the county recorder a copy of the
certificate of registration issued by the Secretary of State pursuant
to section 1 of this act and the name of the corporation, limited-
liability company or affiliate of such an entity on the deed matches
the name on the certificate of registration accompanying the deed;
and
(b) The deed must clearly set forth that the residential real
property is not the primary residence of the owner.
8. The provisions of subsection 7 do not apply to a
corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an entity
that owns less than 10 units of residential real property in this
State.
9. As used in this section, the terms “corporation” and
“limited-liability company” have the meanings ascribed to them in
section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State for personnel,
travel, operating, equipment, information services and contractor
-
*SB395_R3*

– 5 –
costs to carry out the provisions of section 1 of this act the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 .................................. $476,004
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 .................................... $81,705
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively.
Sec. 4. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 3 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective on October 1,
2023.
H
-
*SB395_R3*